Alaska statutes. Title 38. Public Land.
Chapter 35. Right-of-Way Leasing Act.

Cross references. —

For Alaska Gasline Inducement Act, see AS 43.90.

Administrative Code. —

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

Sec. 38.35.010.
Legislative declaration of policy.

The natural resources of this state in crude oil and natural gas and in its land for transportation of these resources and their products by pipeline toward markets both in and out of the state are capable of making a significant contribution to the general welfare of the people of this state. It is the policy of this state that the development, use, and control of a pipeline transportation system be directed to make the maximum contribution to the development of the human resources of this state, the increase in the standard of living for all of its residents, the advancement of existing and potential sectors of its economy, the strengthening of free competition in its private enterprise system, and the careful protection of its incomparable natural environment.

The State of Alaska reserves unto itself all rights, powers, privileges, and immunities not preempted by federal interstate commerce laws and regulations in the right-of-way leasing of any state land for pipeline construction, transmission, or operation within its boundaries.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 1 ch 3 FSSLA 1973)

Collateral references. —

63C Am. Jur. 2d, Public Lands, §§ 37, 53 to 55, 74, 111.

73B C.J.S., Public Lands, §§ 94-98.

Sec. 38.35.015.
Powers of the commissioner.

The commissioner has all powers necessary and proper to implement the policy, purposes, and provisions of this chapter, so as to subserve, as the exercise of reasoned discretion determines, the public interest, convenience and necessity, including but not limited to

granting leases of state land for pipeline right-of-way purposes;

leasing, purchasing, or otherwise acquiring (including condemning by declaration of taking) easements or other interests in land in this state for the purpose of utilizing or granting leases of the land, easements, or interests for pipeline right-of-way purposes;

purchasing interests in pipelines in accordance with options included in right-of-way leases;

investigating any matters concerning any lessee with a view to assuring compliance by it with its right-of-way lease, this chapter, and any other applicable state or federal law;

developing from time to time and maintaining a comprehensive master plan for pipeline transportation development;

developing and promoting programs to foster efficient, economical, and safe pipeline transportation services in the state;

coordinating the activities of the commissioner under this chapter with the transportation and other relevant activities of other public agencies and authorities;

constructing, extending, enlarging, improving, repairing, acquiring, operating, or engaging in transportation, service, or sale by any pipeline or providing for these by contract, lease, or other arrangement on those terms that the commissioner may consider necessary, convenient, or desirable with any agency, corporation, or person, including but not limited to any carrier or any state agency, when the commissioner determines that a lessee carrier is not willing to undertake and complete the action within a reasonable time, and to sell, lease, grant, and dispose of any property constructed or acquired in the exercise of this power.

History.

(§ 3 ch 72 SLA 1972; am §§ 25 — 27 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am § 38 ch 127 SLA 1974)

Revisor’s notes. —

Formerly AS 38.05.020(c). Renumbered in 1984.

Administrative Code. —

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

Sec. 38.35.017.
Limitation on leases in or adjacent to the Beaufort Sea.

Consistent with and in furtherance of the statements of general state policy guiding resource development set out in art. VIII, sec. 1, Constitution of the State of Alaska, that the resources of the state be developed “by making them available for maximum use consistent with the public interest” and in art. VIII, sec. 2, Constitution of the State of Alaska, directing that provision shall be made by the legislature for “the utilization, development, and conservation of all natural resources belonging to the State . . . for the maximum benefit of its people,” and consistent with and in furtherance of the general legislative declaration of policy for this chapter set out in AS

38.35.010

, it is the policy of this state that the overall strategy for development, use, and control of a pipeline or pipelines to develop the state’s substantial North Slope natural gas resources be directed

to enhance the standard of living of state residents by

ensuring that, in conjunction with out-of-state market driven commercial demand for North Slope natural gas, state residents and businesses will have access, directly or indirectly, to that portion of the gas that will meet the reasonably foreseeable in-state demands for it, including substitution of the North Slope natural gas for depleting gas reserves in Southcentral Alaska in order to maintain a vital domestic and industrial energy source, and ensuring that the pipeline or pipelines for the transportation of North Slope natural gas will be designed and located to be responsive to these requirements;

making the maximum contribution to the development of job opportunities in this state by

providing direct short-term construction and long-term operation- and maintenance-related employment on the pipeline or pipelines, to the end that the resources be developed with qualified contractors and firms in this state for work to be performed, including the fabrication and installation of required facilities, and that state residents be employed, consistent with law; for purposes of this sub-subparagraph, a person is considered a resident if the person is physically present in the state with the intent to remain in the state indefinitely and has a home in the state, and a contractor or firm is considered as qualified if the contractor or firm qualifies as an Alaska bidder; in this sub-subparagraph, “Alaska bidder” has the meaning given in AS

36.30.990

; and

providing necessary support services; and

adding significant long-term property value to the tax base of the state and local governments, thereby providing the means to support public education, public health, transportation, and other essential state and local government projects and services;

to ensure that the design, location, and construction of a pipeline or pipelines for delivery of North Slope natural gas to North American markets through connection to the North American natural gas pipeline network enhance opportunities for implementing gas deliveries using alternative technologies and the construction of other pipelines to deliver North Slope natural gas to foreign and domestic markets; and

to ensure construction of the pipeline or pipelines consistent with careful protection of the state’s natural environment, with minimum environmental degradation, to the greatest extent possible, and with protection of fish, wildlife, and biotic resources for the use of persons who depend upon them by using available transportation infrastructure to initiate and complete project construction and maintenance and by avoiding duplication of facilities.

Consistent with the legislative policy and goals set out in (a) of this section, the commissioner may not grant a lease across state land that is in or adjacent to the Beaufort Sea for pipeline right-of-way purposes to authorize construction and operation of a natural gas pipeline following a “northern” or “over-the-top” route running east from the North Slope to Canada’s Mackenzie River Valley, then south to link to existing pipeline networks to transport North Slope natural gas to North American markets.

The limitation on leasing set out in (b) of this section does not apply on and after the date on which a natural gas pipeline following a “southern” route that parallels the Trans Alaska Pipeline System and the Alaska Highway to transport North Slope natural gas to North American markets or Alaska tidewater for delivery to foreign and domestic markets has been completed and has begun operation.

History.

(§ 1 ch 29 SLA 2001; am § 25 ch 59 SLA 2013)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective June 27, 2013, in (a)(1)(B)(i), substituted “; in this sub-subparagraph, ‘Alaska bidder’ has the meaning given in AS

36.30.990

” for “under AS 36.30.170(b)”.

Sec. 38.35.020.
Grant of right-of-way lease.

Rights-of-way on state land including rights-of-way over, under, along, across, or upon the right-of-way of a public road or highway or the right-of-way of a railroad or other public utility, or across, upon, over, or under a river or other body of water or land belonging to or administered by the state may be granted by noncompetitive lease by the commissioner for pipeline purposes for the transportation of oil, products, or natural gas under those conditions prescribed by law or by administrative regulation. Except to the extent authorized by an oil and gas lease, a gas only lease, or an oil and gas or gas only unit agreement approved by the state, no person may engage in any construction or operation of any part of an oil, products, or natural gas pipeline, which in whole or in part is or is proposed to be on state land unless that person has obtained from the commissioner a right-of-way lease of the land under this chapter.

The commissioner may by regulation exempt the construction or operation of field gathering lines or any reasonable classification of them from the requirement of a right-of-way lease under this chapter.

The commissioner may provide in a lease issued under this section that a lessee may, with the approval of the commissioner, use materials from state land when necessary to protect state land and resources from the dangers or hazards resulting from damage caused by a pipeline disaster or emergency. If the commissioner approves the use of state materials under this subsection, the materials remain the property of the state until the material is sold to the lessee in accordance with the provisions of the lease. However, the approval does not transfer responsibility for clean up of the materials to the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 2 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am § 2 ch 119 SLA 1986; am § 47 ch 49 SLA 2004)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For timber and material sale procedures, see 11 AAC 71, art. 1.

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

Opinions of attorney general. —

The lease conversion provisions enacted by 1977 legislation (§§ 12, 13, ch. 138, SLA 1977, as amended by § 21, ch. 182, SLA 1978) applied only to those leases entered into under the substantive statutory provisions which were amended by the 1977 legislation.
Hence, substantive amendments to AS 38.05 could not be applied to a lease which was not authorized by the leasing provisions of AS 38.05, but rather by the leasing provisions of this chapter, and the state was not estopped from challenging the validity of the terms of a wrongfully converted lease.
December 10, 1985, Op. Att’y Gen.

Sec. 38.35.030.
Abandonment, reduction, or impairment of service of pipeline.

A lessee may not abandon any portion of a pipeline that is subject to a lease granted under this chapter, or operation or transportation, service, or sale by it, or reduce or impair service, except in accordance with the terms of the lease or AS

38.35.040

.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 3 ch 3 FSSLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

Sec. 38.35.040.
Temporary or emergency service or temporary abandonment, reduction, or impairment of service by lessee.

The commissioner may, either upon a request made in the form required by regulation, or in the exercise of discretion without request, authorize or require temporary or emergency rendering of service or temporary or emergency abandonment, reduction, or impairment of service by a pipeline of a lessee without compliance with AS

38.35.050

—

38.35.100

. Nothing in this section prevents a carrier from temporarily suspending operations in the event of an emergency which threatens public health or safety; however, notice shall be given the commissioner as soon as possible.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 4 ch 3 FSSLA 1973)

Administrative Code. —

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

Sec. 38.35.050.
Applications for right-of-way leases.

A person or persons desiring to own a pipeline which is proposed to be located in whole or in part on state land, shall apply for a noncompetitive right-of-way lease of the state land.

Applications under (a) of this section shall be made in a form and manner prescribed by regulation, and shall include any and all data, information, plans, and exhibits which the commissioner determines are necessary to prepare the analysis required by AS

38.35.080

and to make a decision under AS

38.35.100

.

Any amendment to an application filed under this section that constitutes a substantial change in the application is subject to all provisions of this chapter applying to an original application. For purposes of this subsection,

an amendment constitutes a substantial change in the application only if the amendment proposes

a net increase in the amount of state acreage to be leased for the right-of-way that exceeds by at least 10 percent the amount of the acreage in the applicant’s original application;

a change in the design of the pipeline that would use less effective environmental or safety mitigation measures or less advanced technology than proposed in the original application; or

a fundamental change in the general route, which would include the origin or terminus, as set out in the original application;

in calculating the percentage increase in acreage under (1)(A) of this subsection, each of the following must be excluded:

the acreage attributable to an amendment of a right-of-way originally issued by the federal government, whether administered by the state or the federal government; and

land subject to an existing federal right-of-way grant held by the applicant that is transferred to the state for its administration.

All persons owning or planning to own an interest in a pipeline or proposed pipeline subject to a lease must join in the application under (a) of this section. Any person employed by the lessee in operating the pipeline is bound by the covenants of the lease applicable to functions within the scope of employment as if the person were an applicant under the lease and the state may enforce any breach of a covenant directly against an operator who is not in compliance with the covenant.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 5 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am § 1 ch 26 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For fees for department services, see 11 AAC 5.

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

Sec. 38.35.060.
Application for certificate to abandon or diminish service. [Repealed, § 6 ch 3 FSSLA 1973.]

Sec. 38.35.070.
Notice of application.

Upon receiving an application under AS

38.35.050

, the commissioner shall

cause notice of it to appear in a daily newspaper of general circulation published in the vicinity of the location of the proposed pipeline, the notice to include:

a general description of the land involved;

a summary of the substance of the application;

file copies of the application with each coordinate agency;

furnish at cost copies of a notice or application to persons requesting them; and

provide other publication and notice the commissioner considers reasonable and appropriate to inform the public of the application.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 7 ch 3 FSSLA 1973)

Sec. 38.35.080.
Analysis and public hearing.

The commissioner shall, within a reasonable time after receiving the application, prepare an analysis of the application or of the matter of which the commissioner was notified, including a proposal for action if feasible; a proposed lease and a general statement of the basis and purpose of the commissioner, if favorable action is proposed; or, when a proposal for action is not feasible before a hearing, a description of the subjects and issues involved.

Upon completion of the analysis but not less than 30 days before the date set for hearing an application or an amendment to an application that, under AS

38.35.050(c)

, constitutes a substantial change in the application, the commissioner shall publish notice, and make copies available as provided in AS

38.35.070

.

The commissioner shall set all applications for public hearing as soon as practicable, if a public hearing on an application is requested by any person within 30 days of publication of notice under AS

38.35.070

(1) or if the proposed action being considered involves a substantial public interest. The commissioner shall set the application for public hearing and publish notice of the time and place of the public hearing at least 30 days before the hearing.

The provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (AS 44.62) do not apply to hearings held under this section.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 8 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am § 2 ch 26 SLA 2001)

Sec. 38.35.090.
Multiple applications for same lease.

When the commissioner receives within a 30-day period two or more applications relating to the same or substantially the same subject matter, the commissioner shall consider the applications upon a comparative basis.
The commissioner may extend the time within which a carrier may submit an application for consideration upon a comparative basis with a previously filed application.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972)

Sec. 38.35.100.
Decision on application.

The commissioner shall promptly determine, in a written finding, on an application filed under AS

38.35.050

, whether the applicant is fit, willing, and able to perform the transportation or other acts proposed in a manner that will be required by the present or future public interest. In making a determination the commissioner shall consider whether or not

the proposed use of the right-of-way will unreasonably conflict with existing uses of the land involving a superior public interest;

the applicant has the technical and financial capability to protect state and private property interests;

the applicant has the technical and financial capability to take action to the extent reasonably practical to

prevent any significant adverse environmental impact, including but not limited to erosion of the surface of the land and damage to fish and wildlife and their habitat;

undertake any necessary restoration or revegetation; and

protect the interests of individuals living in the general area of the right-of-way who rely on fish, wildlife, and biotic resources of the area for subsistence purposes;

the applicant has the financial capability to pay reasonably foreseeable damages for which the applicant may become liable on claims arising from the construction, operation, maintenance, or termination of the pipeline;

the applicant has agreed that in the construction and operation of a pipeline within the right-of-way the applicant will comply with, and require contractors and their subcontractors to comply with, applicable and valid laws and regulations regarding the hiring of residents of the state then in effect or that take effect subsequently.

If the commissioner makes the determinations under (a) of this section favorably to the applicant, then the commissioner may grant the whole or part of the application. If the commissioner makes the determinations under (a)(1) — (5) of this section favorably to the applicant but determines that the applicant is not then fit, willing, and able to perform under the application, the commissioner may grant the application under a conditional lease subject to conditions established by the commissioner that will ensure that the applicant will, within a prescribed period of time not exceeding 10 years, establish that the applicant is fit, willing, and able, under (a) of this section, to perform the transportation or other acts that will be required by the present or future public interest. An applicant is not entitled to a notice or authorization to proceed to construction, or its equivalent, under a conditional lease until the commissioner determines in writing that the applicant has satisfactorily established that the applicant is then fit, willing, and able to perform under (a) of this section. Otherwise, the commissioner shall deny the application.

The commissioner may offer the applicant a lease or a conditional lease under this section. If the applicant does not accept a lease offered under this section within 30 days, the lease offered is withdrawn.

The commissioner shall include in a conditional lease each requirement and condition of the covenants established under AS

38.35.120

or

38.35.121

, as applicable. The commissioner may also require that the lessee agree to additional conditions that the commissioner finds to be in the public interest. In place of the covenant established under AS

38.35.120(a)(9)

, the commissioner shall require the lessee to agree that it will not transfer, assign, pledge, or dispose of in any manner, directly or indirectly, its interest in a conditional right-of-way lease or a pipeline subject to the conditional lease, unless the commissioner, after considering the public interest and issuing written findings to substantiate a decision to allow the transfer, authorizes the transfer. The commissioner shall also require the lessee to agree not to allow the transfer of control of the lessee without the approval of the commissioner; as used in this subsection, “transfer of control of the lessee” means the transfer of 30 percent or more, in the aggregate, of ownership interest in the lessee in one or more transactions to one or more persons by one or more persons.

The commissioner shall require a conditional lessee to agree that

in the absence of the approval of the commissioner, a transfer may not relieve the lessee of an obligation assumed under the lease;

a transfer, including the transfer of lessee, that occurs without the approval of the commissioner is ineffective to transfer interests in and obligations under the lease; and

a transfer constitutes a default under the lease.

In an application for the approval under (d) of this section of a transfer of an interest, the commissioner shall consider whether the proposed transferee will be fit, willing, and able to perform the transportation or other acts proposed under the conditions established in the conditional lease and whether the transfer is in the public interest. In approving the transfer of an interest under (d) of this section and this subsection, the commissioner may impose any condition on the transfer that the commissioner considers in the public interest.

If, during the term of a conditional lease, the commissioner determines under (a) of this section that the applicant is fit, willing, and able to perform the transportation or other acts proposed in a manner that will be required by the present or future public interest, the commissioner may amend the conditional right-of-way lease to insert the covenant established in AS

38.35.120(a)(9)

in place of the covenant against a transfer established under (d) and (e) of this section.

The issuance of a conditional lease does not prevent the commissioner from issuing other conditional or unconditional leases for the same right-of-way. A conditional lease may be revoked at any time that the commissioner determines that the applicant or conditional lessee will not be fit, willing, and able to perform during the term of the lease or when another applicant or conditional lessee is determined to be fit, willing, and able to perform under an application or lease for all or part of the right-of-way. An applicant or conditional lessee accrues no rights, including preference or priority rights, to a particular right-of-way until the commissioner makes a determination that the applicant or conditional lessee is then fit, willing, and able to perform the transportation or other acts proposed under (a) of this section.

The commissioner shall insert a provision implementing the requirements of (a)(5) of this section into each agreement entered into by the commissioner for the construction and operation of a pipeline within the state.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 9 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am §§ 1, 2 ch 51 SLA 1987; am § 8 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Administrative Code. —

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective May 22, 2013, in (d), inserted “or 38.35.121, as applicable” at the end of the first sentence.

Sec. 38.35.110.
Term of lease; continuation.

Each lease of state land for pipeline right-of-way purposes must contain a provision that the lease shall run for a specified term of not greater than 30 years, and shall be renewable for additional periods of up to 30 years each, so long as the lessee is in commercial operation and is in full compliance with all state law, including but not limited to state law pertaining to regulation and taxation of the pipeline facility, and is in compliance with all terms of the lease. In making this determination, the commissioner shall take into consideration the cost of the proposed pipeline, its useful life, and the probable financing requirement for the proposed pipeline.

If the lessee has timely requested and is pursuing renewal and the determination on the renewal has not been issued before expiration of the existing lease term, the commissioner shall continue the lease subject to the terms and conditions that were applicable to the lease in effect at the time of expiration of the lease’s term until the commissioner issues a final determination on the renewal.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 10 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am §§ 1, 2 ch 18 SLA 2001)

Administrative Code. —

For pipeline right-of-way leasing, see 11 AAC 80.

Sec. 38.35.120.
Covenants required to be included in lease to a pipeline that is not a natural gas pipeline contract carrier.

Except as provided for a natural gas pipeline subject to AS

38.35.121

, a noncompetitive lease of state land for a right-of-way for an oil or natural gas pipeline valued at $1,000,000 or more may be granted only upon the condition that the lessee expressly covenants in the lease, in consideration of the rights acquired by it under the lease, that

it assumes the status of and will perform all of its functions undertaken under the lease as a common carrier and will accept, convey, and transport without discrimination crude oil or natural gas, depending on the kind of pipeline involved, delivered to it for transportation from fields in the vicinity of the pipeline subject to the lease throughout its route both on state land obtained under the lease and on the other land; it will accept, convey, and transport crude oil or natural gas without unjust or unreasonable discrimination in favor of one producer or person, including itself, as against another but will take the crude oil or natural gas, depending on the kind of pipeline involved, delivered or offered, without unreasonable discrimination, that the Regulatory Commission of Alaska shall, after a full hearing with due notice to the interested parties and a proper finding of facts, determine to be reasonable in the performance of its duties as a common carrier; however, a lessee that owns or operates a natural gas pipeline

subject to regulation either under 15 U.S.C. 717 et seq. (Natural Gas Act) or by the state or a political subdivision with respect to rates and charges for the sale of natural gas, is, to the extent of that regulation, exempt from the common carrier requirement in this paragraph;

that is a North Slope natural gas pipeline (i) is required to operate as a common carrier only with respect to the intrastate transportation of North Slope natural gas, as that term is defined in AS

42.06.630

, and (ii) is not required to operate as a common carrier as to a liquefied natural gas facility or a marine terminal facility associated with the pipeline, and is not otherwise required to perform its functions under the lease as a common carrier; for purposes of this subparagraph, “North Slope natural gas pipeline” means all the facilities of a total system of pipe, whether owned or operated under a contract, agreement, or lease, used by a carrier for transportation of North Slope natural gas, as defined by AS

42.06.630

, for delivery, for storage, or for further transportation, and including all pipe, compressor stations, station equipment, tanks, valves, access roads, bridges, airfields, terminals and terminal facilities, including docks and tanker loading facilities, operations control centers for both the upstream part of the pipeline and the terminal, tanker ballast treatment facilities, fire protection system, communication system, and all other facilities used or necessary for an integral line of pipe, taken as a whole, to carry out transportation, including an extension or enlargement of the line;

it will interchange crude oil or natural gas, depending on the kind of pipeline involved, with each like common carrier and provide connections and facilities for the interchange of crude oil or natural gas at every locality reached by both pipelines when the necessity exists, subject to rates and regulations made by the appropriate state or federal regulatory agency;

it will maintain and preserve books, accounts, and records and will make those reports that the state may prescribe by regulation or law as necessary and appropriate for purposes of administration of this chapter;

it will accord at all reasonable times to the state and its authorized agents and auditors the right of access to its property and records, of inspection of its property, and of examination and copying of records;

it will provide connections, as determined by the Regulatory Commission of Alaska under AS

42.06.340

, to facilities on the pipeline subject to the lease, both on state land and other land in the state, for the purpose of delivering crude oil or natural gas, depending on the kind of pipeline involved, to persons (including the state and its political subdivisions) contracting for the purchase at wholesale of crude oil or natural gas transported by the pipeline when required by the public interest;

it shall, notwithstanding any other provision, provide connections and interchange facilities at state expense at places the state considers necessary if the state determines to take a portion of its royalty or taxes in oil or natural gas;

it will construct and operate the pipeline in accordance with applicable state laws and lawful regulations and orders of the Regulatory Commission of Alaska;

it will, at its own expense, during the term of the lease,

maintain the leasehold and pipeline in good repair;

promptly repair or remedy damage to the leasehold;

promptly compensate for damage to or destruction of property for which the lessee is liable resulting from damage to or destruction of the leasehold or pipeline;

it will not transfer, assign, or dispose of, in any manner, directly or indirectly, or by transfer of control of the carrier corporation, its interest in a right-of-way lease, or rights under the lease or a pipeline subject to the lease to a person other than another owner of the pipeline (including subsidiaries, parents, and affiliates of the owners), except to the extent that the commissioner, after consideration of the protection of the public interest (including whether the proposed transferee is fit, willing, and able to perform the transportation or other acts proposed in a manner that will reasonably protect the lives, property, and general welfare of the people of Alaska), authorizes; the commissioner shall not unreasonably withhold consent to the transfer, assignment, or disposal;

it will file with the commissioner a written appointment of a named permanent resident of the state to be its registered agent in the state and to receive service of notices, regulations, decisions, and orders of the commissioner; if it fails to appoint an agent for service, service may be made by posting a copy in the office of the commissioner, filing a copy in the office of the lieutenant governor, and mailing a copy to the lessee’s last known address;

the applicable law of this state will be used in resolving questions of interpretation of the lease;

the granting of the right-of-way lease is subject to the express condition that the exercise of the rights and privileges granted under the lease will not unduly interfere with the management, administration, or disposal by the state of the land affected by the lease, and that the lessee agrees and consents to the occupancy and use by the state, its grantees, permittees, or other lessees of any part of the right-of-way not actually occupied or required by the pipeline for the full and safe utilization of the pipeline, for necessary operations incident to land management, administration, or disposal;

it will be liable to the state for damages or injury incurred by the state caused by the construction, operation, or maintenance of the pipeline and it will indemnify the state for the liabilities or damages;

it will procure and furnish liability and property damage insurance from a company licensed to do business in the state or furnish other security or undertaking upon the terms and conditions the commissioner considers necessary if the commissioner finds that the net assets of the lessee are insufficient to protect the public from damage for which the lessee may be liable arising out of the construction or operation of the pipeline.

Except as provided for a natural gas pipeline subject to AS

38.35.121

, for a right-of-way lease granted under this chapter for an oil or natural gas pipeline valued at $1,000,000 or more to be valid and of legal effect, it must contain the terms required to be inserted under the provisions of AS

38.35.110

—

38.35.140

. An oil or natural gas pipeline right-of-way lease granted under this chapter and subject to this section that does not contain the required terms is null and void and without legal effect and does not vest any interest in state land or any authority in the carrier granted the lease.

The commissioner may insert in any right-of-way lease other reasonable provisions and conditions required by the public interest.

The lease will also contain terms and conditions that are reasonably necessary to obligate the lessee, to the extent reasonably practicable, to

prevent conflicts with other existing uses of the land involving a superior public interest;

protect state and private property interests;

prevent any significant adverse environmental impact, including but not limited to the erosion of the surface of the land, and damage to fish and wildlife and their habitat;

restore and revegetate during the term and at termination of the lease; and

protect the interests of individuals living in the general area of the right of way who rely on the fish, wildlife, and biotic resources of the area for subsistence purposes.

In the event the commissioner proposes to offer a lease or leases to two or more lessees for the same pipeline, the commissioner may include terms in the lease or leases which establish the limit of the obligations and liabilities of each lessee arising under this chapter or under the lease or leases.

History.

(§ 1 ch 72 SLA 1972; am § 11 ch 3 FSSLA 1973; am §§ 2, 3 ch 110 SLA 1981; am § 69 ch 59 SLA 1982; am § 1 ch 56 SLA 2000; am § 15 ch 22 SLA 2001; am §§ 9, 10 ch 11 SLA 2013)

Revisor’s notes. —

Former (f) of this section was renumbered as AS

38.35.122

in 1984.

In 1999, in paragraphs (a)(1), (a)(5), and (a)(7) “Regulatory Commission of Alaska” was substituted for “Alaska Public Utilities Commission” in accordance with § 30(a), ch. 25, SLA 1999.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2013 amendment, effective May 22, 2013, in the beginning of the introductory language of (a), added “Except as provided for a natural gas pipeline subject to AS

38.35.121

,”; in (a)(1)(A), substituted “under 15 U.S.C. 717 et seq. (Natural Gas Act) or by the state or a political subdivision” for “under the Natural Gas Act (15 U.S.C. 717 et seq.) of the United States or by the state or political subdivisions”; in (a)(6), deleted “such” preceding “places the state”; in (a)(8)(B) and (C), deleted “any” preceding “damage to”; in (a)(9), deleted “any” preceding “rights,” and substituted “a pipeline” for “any pipeline” and “a person” for “any person”; in (b), added “Except as provided for a natural gas pipeline subject to AS

38.35.121

” at the beginning, and in the second sentence, inserted “and subject to this section” following “under this chapter”.